Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5320.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
CHAPTER XVII
Sec. 16b. This chapter applies to the following felonies
enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws:
M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max
JJR H03694'25 a (H-1) udth4g


750.43a Pub saf E Aiming a beam of 5
directed energy
emitted from a
directed energy device
at or into path of
aircraft or a moving
train
750.45a(1)750.45a Pub saf F Using Certain 4
(6) violations related to
using an unmanned
aircraft in a manner
that interferes with
certain facilities or
other unmanned vehicle
committed knowingly
and with malicious
intent
750.45a(2) Pub saf F Flying over or causing 4
an unmanned aircraft
to hover over facility
designated on federal
registry
750.49(2)(a) to Pub ord F Fighting animals or 4
(d) providing facilities
for animal fights
750.49(2)(e) Pub ord F Organizing or 4
promoting animal
fights
750.49(2)(f) Pub ord H Attending animal fight 4
JJR H03694'25 a (H-1) udth4g


750.49(2)(g) Pub ord F Breeding or selling 4
fighting animals
750.49(2)(h) Pub ord F Selling or possessing 4
equipment for animal
fights
750.49(8) Person A Inciting fighting Life
animal resulting in
death
750.49(9) Person F Inciting fighting 4
animal to attack
750.49(10) Person D Fighting animal 15
attacking without
provocation and death
resulting
750.50(4)(c) Pub ord G Animal neglect or 2
cruelty involving 4 or
more animals but fewer
than 10 animals or
with 1 prior
conviction
750.50(4)(d) Pub ord F Animal neglect or 4
cruelty involving 10
or more animals but
fewer than 25 animals
or with 2 prior
convictions
JJR H03694'25 a (H-1) udth4g


750.50(4)(e) Pub ord E Animal neglect or 7
cruelty involving 25
or more animals or
with 3 or more prior
convictions
750.50(4)(f) Pub ord G Animal neglect or 2
cruelty by breeder or
pet shop operator with
5 or more prior
violations of 1969 PA
287, MCL 287.331 to
287.340
750.50b(3) Property D First degree killing 10
or torturing animals
750.50b(4) Property E Second degree killing 7
or torturing animals
750.50b(5) Property F Third degree killing 4
or torturing animals
750.50c(5) Pub ord E Killing or causing 5
serious physical harm
to law enforcement
animal or search and
rescue dog
750.50c(7) Pub saf H Harassing or causing 2
harm to law
enforcement animal or
search and rescue dog
while committing crime
JJR H03694'25 a (H-1) udth4g


750.68 Property G Changing brands with 4
intent to steal
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless House Bill No. 5319 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
JJR H03694'25 a (H-1) udth4g